Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.160

Violations of chapter—"Stop sale, use or removal" order.

When the director has reasonable cause to believe a pesticide or device is being distributed, stored, or transported in violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, or of any of the prescribed rules under this chapter, the director may issue and serve a written "stop sale, use or removal" order upon the owner or custodian of any such pesticide or device. If the owner or custodian is not available for service of the order, the director may attach the order to the pesticide or device. The pesticide or device shall not be sold, used or removed until the provisions of this chapter have been complied with and the pesticide or device has been released in writing under conditions specified by the director, or the violation has been otherwise disposed of as provided in this chapter by a court of competent jurisdiction.

[ 1989 c 380 s 12; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 16.]